Maryland, session 2025, SB0585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
6–411.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0585*

SENATE BILL 585
(2) (i) “Dwelling” means a building or part of a building that provides
living or sleeping facilities for one or more individuals.
(ii) “Dwelling” does not include:
1. common elements of a condominium, as defined in §
11–101 of the Real Property Article;
2. property of a cooperative housing corporation other than a
unit as defined in § 5–6B–01 of the Corporations and Associations Article; or
3. common areas of a multifamily dwelling as defined in §
12–203 of the Public Safety Article.
(3) “Firearm” has the meaning stated in § 4–104 of this article.
(4) “Law enforcement official” has the meaning stated in § 4–201 of this
article.
(5) “Police officer” has the meaning stated in § 3–201 of the Public Safety
Article.
(6) (i) “Property” means a building.
(ii) “Property” does not include the land adjacent to a building.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) a law enforcement official or police officer;
(2) an on–duty employee of a law enforcement agency authorized by the
agency to possess firearms on duty or whose duty assignment involves the possession of
firearms;
(3) a member of the armed forces of the United States, the National Guard,
or the uniformed services on duty or traveling to or from duty;
(4) a correctional officer or warden of a correctional facility in the State;
(5) the wearing, carrying, or transporting of a firearm on a portion of real
property subject to an easement, a right–of–way, a servitude, or any other property interest
that allows public access on or through the real property; [or]
(6) the wearing, carrying, or transporting of a firearm on a portion of real
property subject to an easement, a right–of–way, a servitude, or any other property interest
allowing access on or through the real property by:

SENATE BILL 585 3
(i) the holder of the easement, right–of–way, servitude, or other
property interest; or
(ii) a guest or assignee of the holder of the easement, right–of–way,
servitude, or other property interest; OR
(7) A PERSON WHO HAS RETIRED AS A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICIAL
IN GOOD STANDING FROM A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OF THE UNITED STATES,
THE STATE OR ANOTHER STATE, OR A LOCAL UNIT IN THE STATE OR ANOTHER
STATE WHO POSSESSES A FIREARM, IF:
(I) 1. THE PERSON IS CARRYING THE PERSON’S BADGE OR
CREDENTIAL IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE BADGE OR
CREDENTIAL;
2. THE FIREARM CARRIED OR POSSESSED BY THE
PERSON IS CONCEALED FROM VIEW UNDER OR WITHIN AN ARTICLE OF THE
PERSON’S CLOTHING; AND
3. THE PERSON IS AUTHORIZED TO CARRY A HANDGUN
UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE OR THE UNITED STATES; OR
(II) 1. THE PERSON POSSESSES A VALID PERMIT TO WEAR,
CARRY, OR TRANSPORT A HANDGUN ISSUED UNDER TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE
PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; AND
2. THE FIREARM CARRIED OR POSSESSED BY THE
PERSON IS CONCEALED FROM VIEW UNDER OR WITHIN AN ARTICLE OF THE
PERSON’S CLOTHING.
(c) A person wearing, carrying, or transporting a firearm may not enter or
trespass in the dwelling of another unless the owner or the owner’s agent has given express
permission, either to the person or to the public generally, to wear, carry, or transport a
firearm inside the dwelling.
(d) A person wearing, carrying, or transporting a firearm may not:
(1) enter or trespass on property unless the owner or the owner’s agent has
posted a clear and conspicuous sign indicating that it is permissible to wear, carry, or
transport a firearm on the property; or
(2) enter or trespass on property unless the owner or the owner’s agent has
given the person express permission to wear, carry, or transport a firearm on the property.

SENATE BILL 585
(e) A person who willfully violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on
conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or a fine not exceeding $1,000
or both.
(f) (1) A conviction under this section may not merge with a conviction for any
other crime based on the act establishing the violation of this section.
(2) A sentence imposed under this section may be imposed separate from
and consecutive to or concurrent with a sentence for any crime based on the act establishing
the violation of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.